Hawaii statutes.
§329D-4 Medical marijuana dispensaries;
license application procedure and verification; fees. (a) The department shall
make a medical marijuana dispensary license application form available to the
public on January 11, 2016, commencing at 8:00 a.m., Hawaii-Aleutian Standard
Time.

(b) The department shall establish an open
application period for each available license, the first of which shall be no
later than 8:00 a.m., Hawaii-Aleutian Standard Time, on January 12, 2016,
during which an application may be submitted. This submittal period shall be
closed on January 29, 2016, at 4:30 p.m. The department shall publish notice
of the open application period no less than thirty days prior to the start of
the open application period.

(c) A nonrefundable application fee of $5,000 for
each license application shall be submitted to the department by certified or
cashier's check. Within seven days of approval, a dispensary license fee of
$75,000 for each license approved shall be submitted to the department by certified
or cashier's check or the department shall issue a license to the next
qualified applicant.

(d) All fees collected pursuant to this
section shall be deposited in the medical marijuana registry and regulation
special fund pursuant to section 321-30.1.

(e) Immediately upon receipt of each completed
application form, the department shall issue a receipt to each applicant that includes
the date and time of receipt.

(f) If an applicant submits an application
form in which all required information is not complete and valid, the
application shall not be accepted by the department and the nonrefundable
application fee shall be deposited in the medical marijuana registry and
regulation special fund established pursuant to section 321-30.1.

(g) The medical marijuana dispensary
application form shall request information necessary to verify that applicants
meet the required qualifications pursuant to section 329D-3. Applicants shall
provide a minimum of the following information:

(1) Legal name and date of birth of individual
applicant;

(2) Last four digits of individual applicant's social
security number;

(3) Validation code from an eCrim report for the
individual applicant generated by the Hawaii criminal justice data center no
earlier than December 12, 2015, at 8:00 a.m., Hawaii-Aleutian Standard Time;

(4) Street address, telephone number, fax number, and
e-mail address of the individual applicant;

(5) A tax clearance certificate issued by the
department of taxation dated not more than thirty days prior to the date of the
application;

(6) Name of the applying entity and any other name
under which the applying entity does business, if applicable;

(7) Street address, telephone number, fax number, and
e-mail address of the applying entity;

(8) Date the applying entity was organized under the
laws of Hawaii;

(9) A certified copy of the organizing documents of
the applying entity;

(10) A copy of the applying entity's bylaws;

(11) Federal employer identification number of the applying
entity;

(12) Hawaii tax identification number of applying
entity;

(13) Department of commerce and consumer affairs business
registration number and suffix of the applying entity;

(14) Name(s) of all owners of the applying entity, in
whole or in part, and their percentage of ownership;

(15) Date when continuous legal residence in Hawaii began
for each Hawaii legal resident that owns a percentage of the applying entity;

(16) Total percentage of the applying entity that is
owned by Hawaii legal residents;

(17) Designation of the county for which the dispensary
license applied for and proof that the required minimum financial resources of
$1,200,000 are met;

(18) Total dollar amount of financial resources under
control of the applying entity in the form of bank statements or escrow
accounts;

(19) Date from when financial resources have been
continuously controlled by the applying entity; and

(20) Copies of the entity's bank statements for the
twelve months prior to the date of the application.

(h) The department shall maintain a record of
the time and date that all completed application forms were submitted.

(i) The department shall process and deposit
the application fee within four business days of receipt of the completed
application form.

(j) If, for any reason, the application fee is
not available for deposit, the application shall be deemed void and the
department shall inform the applicant in writing that its application has been
rejected.

(k) The department shall review and verify the
information and documentation materials only of applicants whose nonrefundable
application fee has been processed and deposited.

(l) The department shall verify that the
information submitted in the application is true and valid and meets the
requirements established in section 329D-3(b).

(m) Upon verification of the minimum
requirements, the department shall place the verified application into the pool
of applicants for further review and selection based on merit by the
department.

(n) A dispensary license may be renewed
annually by payment of an annual renewal fee of $50,000 and subject to
verification by the department through an unannounced inspection that the
individual licensee and entity licensee continue to meet all licensing
requirements from the date the initial licenses were issued. [L 2015, c 241, pt
of §2; am L 2016, c 184, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next